Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 6. Federal Aid Program Audits

§ 16-4-601.
Audit requirements relating to federal aid; frequency of audits.

Any federal audit requirement for state agencies that receive federal aid shall be made in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards on a biennial basis or as the agency may request.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 40, § 1.